North Carolina, session 2025, HB580.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. PRESERVING CONFIDENTIALITY OF ABSENTEE REQUESTERS
SECTION 1.1. G.S. 163-228(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The official register required by this section section, along with any other information
in the possession of the State Board or a county board which would disclose that an identifiable
voter has requested an absentee ballot, shall be confidential and not a public record until the
opening of the voting place in accordance with G.S. 163-166.25, at which time the official
register these records shall constitute a public record.public records, unless otherwise protected
from disclosure by law."
SECTION 1.2. G.S. 163-233(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The county board of elections shall create a list of applications made for absentee
ballots received and approved by the county board, which shall be updated daily from the date
the county board begins to mail application and ballots through the date of canvass. Such list
shall be a public record."

PART II. REVISIONS TO BALLOT COUNTING PROCEDURES
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 163-182.2(a), as amended by Section 3A.4(e) of S.L. 2024-57,
reads as rewritten:
"(a) The initial counting of official ballots cast on election day and under Part 5 of Article
14A of this Chapter shall be conducted according to the following principles:
(1) Vote counting of ballots cast at the precinct on election day shall occur
immediately after the polls close and shall be continuous until completed. If
ballots cast under Part 5 of Article 14A of this Chapter are counted
electronically, that count shall commence at the time the polls close. If ballots
cast under Part 5 of Article 14A of this Chapter are paper ballots counted
manually, that count shall commence at the same time as mail-in absentee
ballots cast under Article 20 or Article 21A of this Chapter are counted.Vote
counting of ballots cast during early voting shall commence at 5:00 P.M. on
election day. Vote counting of ballots cast during early voting may commence
between the hours of 9:00 A.M. and 5:00 P.M. on election day upon the
adoption of a resolution at least two days before the election in which the hour
*H580-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and place of counting the ballots shall be stated. A copy of the resolution shall
be posted on the county board's website and distributed to all persons required
to receive notice under G.S. 143-318.12(b)(2). The county board shall not
announce the result of the count before 7:30 P.M. on election day.
…
(4) If the county board finds that an individual voting a provisional official ballot
(i) was registered in the county as provided in 163-82.1, (ii) voted in the proper
precinct under G.S. 163-55 and G.S. 163-57, and (iii) was otherwise eligible
to vote, the provisional official ballots shall be counted by the county board
no later than 5:00 P.M. on the third business day after the election. County
boards may review for approval provisional ballots cast during early voting
and take preparatory steps for the count before election day with the same
procedures used for absentee ballots under G.S. 163-234(3), so long as the
preparatory steps do not reveal to any individual not engaged in the actual
count election results before 7:30 P.M. on election day. Except as provided in
G.S. 163-82.15(e), if the county board finds that an individual voting a
provisional official ballot (i) did not vote in the proper precinct under
G.S. 163-55 and G.S. 163-57, (ii) is not registered in the county as provided
in G.S. 163-82.1, or (iii) is otherwise not eligible to vote, the ballot shall not
be counted. If a voter was properly registered to vote in the election by the
county board, no mistake of an election official in giving the voter a ballot or
in failing to comply with G.S. 163-82.15 or G.S. 163-166.11 shall serve to
prevent the counting of the vote on any ballot item the voter was eligible by
registration and qualified by residency to vote. When an individual has voted
a provisional official ballot after completing an affidavit under
G.S. 163-166.16(d), and the county board has not found the affidavit to be
valid by the time specified in this subdivision for counting provisional ballots
because the county board has grounds to believe the affidavit is false, the
county board shall determine whether to count the provisional official ballot
by the county canvass.
…."
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 163-230.1, as amended by Section 3A.4(f) of S.L. 2024-57,
reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-230.1. Simultaneous issuance of absentee ballots with application.
…
(e1) Curable Deficiencies. – If a container-return envelope contains a curable deficiency,
the county board shall promptly notify the voter of the deficiency and the manner in which the
voter may cure the deficiency. Curable deficiencies are deficiencies that can be cured with
supplemental documentation or attestation provided by the voter, including when any of the
following occurs:
(1) The voter did not sign the voter certification as required by
G.S. 163-231(a)(4).
(2) The voter signed the application in the wrong place on the application.
(3) The voter failed to include with the container-return envelope a photocopy of
identification described in G.S. 163-166.16(a) or an affidavit as described in
G.S. 163-166.16(d)(1), (d)(2), or (d)(3), as required by subsection (f1) of this
section.
The identification of the two persons witnessing the casting of the absentee ballot in
accordance with G.S. 163-231(a) is not a curable deficiency. Any container-return envelope with
a curable deficiency that is transmitted to the county board shall be considered timely if cure
documentation is received no later than 12:00 P.M. on the third fourth business day after the
Page 2 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
election. Cure documentation may be transmitted via email to the county board if the deficiency
is one described in subdivision (3) of this subsection. The notification of voters regarding curable
deficiencies is an administrative task that may be performed by county board staff and is not
required to be performed at an absentee meeting as provided for in subsection (f) of this section.
The voter shall be notified of curable deficiencies by mail, and by telephone or email if the
telephone number or email address was provided by the voter on the request form for absentee
ballots.
(f) Required Meeting of County Board of Elections. – During the period commencing on
the fifth Tuesday before an election, election through election day in any election in which
absentee ballots are authorized, the county board shall hold one or more public meetings each
Tuesday at 5:00 P.M. for the purpose of action on applications for absentee ballots. At these
meetings, the county board shall pass upon applications for absentee ballots.
If the county board changes the time of holding its meetings or provides for additional
meetings in accordance with the terms of this subsection, notice of the change in hour and notice
of the schedule of additional meetings, if any, shall be published in a newspaper circulated in the
county at least 30 days prior to the election.posted on the county board's website and distributed
to all persons required to receive notice under G.S. 143-318.12(b)(2) at least two days before any
changed or additional meeting.
At the time the county board makes its decision on an application for absentee ballots, the
county board shall enter in the appropriate column in the register of absentee requests,
applications, and ballots issued opposite the name of the applicant a notation of whether the
applicant's application was "Approved" or "Disapproved".
The decision of the county board on the validity of an application for absentee ballots shall
be final subject only to such review as may be necessary in the event of an election contest. The
county board shall constitute the proper official body to pass upon the validity of all applications
for absentee ballots received in the county; this function shall not be performed by the chair or
any other member of the county board individually.
…."
SECTION 2.3. G.S. 163-234, as amended by Section 3A.4(g) of S.L. 2024-57, reads
as rewritten:
"§ 163-234. Counting absentee ballots by county board.
All absentee ballots returned to the county board in the container-return envelopes shall be
retained by the county board to be counted by the county board as follows:
…
(2) The county board shall meet at 5:00 P.M. on election day in the county board
office or other public location in the county courthouse for the purpose of
counting all absentee ballots except those which have been challenged before
5:00 P.M. on election day and those received pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(2).
Any elector of the county shall be permitted to attend the meeting and allowed
to observe the counting process, so long as the elector does not in any manner
interfere with the election officials in the discharge of their duties. The count
of these absentee ballots shall be continuous until completed, and the members
shall not separate or leave the counting place except for unavoidable
necessity.The county board shall not adjourn the meeting until the count of
these absentee ballots is complete.
The county board may begin counting absentee ballots issued under
Article 21A of this Chapter between the hours of 9:00 A.M. and 5:00 P.M.
and may begin counting all absentee ballots between the hours of 2:00 P.M.
and 5:00 P.M. upon the adoption of a resolution at least two weeks days prior
to the election in which the hour and place of counting absentee ballots shall
be stated. A copy of the resolution shall be published once a week for two
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
weeks prior to the election, in a newspaper having general circulation in the
county. Notice may additionally be made on a radio or television station or
both, but the notice shall be in addition to the newspaper and other required
notice. The count shall be continuous until completed and the members shall
not separate or leave the counting place except for unavoidable necessity,
except that if the count has been completed prior to the time the polls close, it
shall be suspended until that time pending receipt of any additional ballots.
posted on the county board's website and distributed to all persons required to
receive notice under G.S. 143-318.12(b)(2). Nothing in this section prohibits
a county board from taking preparatory steps for the count earlier than the
times specified in this section, as long as the preparatory steps do not reveal
to any individual not engaged in the actual count election results before the
times specified in this subdivision for the count to begin. By way of
illustration and not limitation, a preparatory step for the count would be the
entry of tally cards from direct record electronic voting units into a computer
for processing. The county board shall not announce the result of the count
before 7:30 P.M.
…
(11) The county board shall meet after the day of the election and prior to the day
of canvass to count absentee ballots received pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(2)
and absentee ballots that have deficiencies that have been cured pursuant to
G.S. 163-230.1(e), upon the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subdivision
(2) of this section. The county board shall comply with all other requirements
of this section and G.S. 163-230.1 for the counting of these absentee ballots.
(12) No later than 5:00 P.M. on the third business day after the election, the county
board shall announce the tally of all absentee ballots, except those subject to
a challenge or challenge, those cast in accordance with Article 21A of this
Chapter.Chapter, or those for which a final decision on a cured deficiency
remains pending."

PART III. POLL WORKER ASSIGNMENT FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 163-41 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-41. Precinct chief judges and judges of election; appointment; terms of office;
qualifications; vacancies; oaths of office.
(a) Appointment of Chief Judge and Judges. – At the meeting required by G.S. 163-31 to
be held on the Tuesday following the third Monday in August of the year in which they are
appointed, the county board of elections shall appoint one person to act as chief judge and two
other persons to act as judges of election for each precinct in the county. Their terms of office
shall continue for two years from the specified date of appointment and until their successors are
appointed and qualified, except that if a nonresident of the precinct is appointed as chief judge
or judge for a precinct, that person's term of office shall end if the board of elections appoints a
qualified resident of the precinct of who is affiliated with the same party party, or a qualified
resident regardless of party affiliation if the nonresident was unaffiliated, to replace the
nonresident chief judge or judge. It shall be their duty to conduct the primaries and elections
within their respective precincts. Persons appointed to these offices must be registered voters and
residents of the county in which the precinct is located, of good repute, and able to read and write.
Not more than one judge in each precinct shall belong to be affiliated with the same political
party as the chief judge. Not more than one judge in each precinct shall be appointed upon the
recommendation of the same political party that recommended the chief judge.
…
Page 4 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The chairman chair of each of the two political party parties in the county having the
greatest numbers of registered voters in the State, where possible possible, shall recommend two
four registered voters in each precinct who are otherwise qualified, are residents of the precinct,
have good moral character, and are able to read and write, for appointment as chief judge or judge
in the precinct, and he shall also recommend where possible the same number of similarly
qualified voters for appointment as judges of election in that precinct. If such recommendations
are received by the county board of elections no later than the fifth day preceding the date on
which appointments are to be made, it must make precinct appointments from the names of those
recommended. Provided that if the party chair submits only one qualified name is submitted by
the fifth day preceding the date on which appointments are to be made, by a party for judge of
election by the chairman of one of the two political parties in the county having the greatest
numbers of registered voters in the State, for judge of election by that date, the county board of
elections must appoint that person.
If the recommendations of the party chairs for chief judge or judge in a precinct are
insufficient, the county board of elections by unanimous vote of all bipartisan majority vote of
its members may name to serve as chief judge or judge in that precinct registered voters in that
precinct who were not recommended by the party chairs. If, after diligently seeking to fill the
positions with registered voters of the precinct, the county board still has an insufficient number
of officials for the precinct, the county board by unanimous vote of all bipartisan majority vote
of its members may appoint to the positions registered voters in other precincts in the same county
who meet the qualifications other than residence to be precinct officials in the precinct, provided
that where possible the county board shall seek and adopt the recommendation of the county
chairman of the political party affected. the recommendations of the county party chairs. In
making its appointments, the county board shall assure, wherever possible, that no precinct has
a chief judge and judges all of whom are registered affiliated with or recommended by the same
party. In no instance shall the county board appoint nonresidents of the precinct to a majority of
the three positions of chief judge and judge in a precinct.The county board shall assure, where
possible, that no precinct has a chief judge and judges all of whom are nonresidents of the
precinct.
(d) If, at any time other than on the day of a primary or election, a chief judge or judge
of election shall be removed from office, or shall die or resign, or if for any other cause there be
a vacancy in a precinct election office, the chairman chair of the county board of elections shall
appoint another in his or her place, promptly notifying him of his or her of the appointment. If at
all possible, the chairman chair of the county board of elections shall consult with the county
chairman chair of the political party of that originally recommended the vacating official, and if
the chairman chair of the county political party nominates a qualified voter of that precinct to fill
the vacancy, the chairman chair of the county board of elections shall appoint that person. In
filling such a vacancy, the chairman chair shall appoint a person who belongs to is affiliated with
the same political party as that to which of the party chair who originally recommended the
vacating member belonged when appointed. official or is unaffiliated. If the chairman chair of
the county board of elections did not appoint a person upon recommendation of the chairman
chair of the party to fill such a vacancy, then the term of office of the person appointed to fill the
vacancy shall expire upon the conclusion of the next canvass held by the county board of
elections under this Chapter, and any successor must be a person nominated by the chairman of
the party of the vacating officer.appointed using the procedures in subsection (c) of this section,
with the chair of the political party recommending two qualified voters for each vacancy to be
filled.
If any person appointed chief judge shall fail to be present at the voting place at the hour of
opening the polls on primary or election day, or if a vacancy in that office shall occur on primary
or election day for any reason whatever, the precinct judges of election shall appoint another to
act as chief judge until such time as the chairman chair of the county board of elections shall
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
appoint to fill the vacancy. If such appointment by the chairman chair of the county board of
elections is not a person nominated by the county chairman chair of the political party of the
vacating officer, then the term of office of the person appointed to fill the vacancy shall expire
upon the conclusion of the next canvass held by the county board of elections under this Chapter.
If a judge of election shall fail to be present at the voting place at the hour of opening the polls
on primary or election day, or if a vacancy in that office shall occur on primary or election day
for any reason whatever, the chief judge shall appoint another to act as judge until such time as
the chairman chair of the county board of elections shall appoint to fill the vacancy. Persons
appointed to fill vacancies shall, whenever possible, be chosen from affiliated with or
recommended by the same political party as the person whose vacancy is being filled, and all
such appointees shall be sworn before acting.
…."
SECTION 3.2. G.S. 163-42 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-42. Assistants at polls; appointment; term of office; qualifications; oath of office.
(a) Each county board of elections is authorized, in its discretion, to appoint two or more
assistants for each precinct to aid the chief judge and judges. Not more than two assistants shall
be appointed in precincts having 500 or less registered voters. Assistants shall be qualified voters
of the county in which the precinct is located. When the board of elections determines that
assistants are needed in a precinct an equal number shall be appointed from different political
parties, unless the requirement as to party affiliation cannot be met because of an insufficient
number of voters of recommended by the different political parties within the county.
In the discretion of the county board of elections, a precinct assistant may serve less than the
full day prescribed for chief judges and judges in G.S. 163-47(a).
(b) The chairman chair of each of the two political party parties in the county having the
greatest numbers of registered voters in the State shall have the right to recommend from three
up to 10 registered voters in each precinct for appointment as precinct assistants in that precinct.
If the recommendations are received by it the county board of elections no later than the thirtieth
day prior to the primary or election, the board shall make appointments of the precinct assistants
for each precinct from the names thus recommended. If the recommendations of the party chairs
for precinct assistant in a precinct are insufficient, the county board of elections by unanimous
vote of all bipartisan majority vote of its members may name to serve as precinct assistant in that
precinct registered voters in that precinct of the county who were not recommended by the party
chairs. If, after diligently seeking to fill the positions with registered voters of the precinct, the
county board still has an insufficient number of precinct assistants for the precinct, the county
board by unanimous vote of all of its members may appoint to the positions registered voters in
other precincts in the same county who meet the qualifications other than residence to be precinct
officials in the precinct. In making its appointments, the county board shall assure, wherever
possible, that no precinct has precinct officials all of whom are registered affiliated with or
recommended by the same party. In no instance shall the county board appoint nonresidents of
the precinct to a majority of the positions as precinct assistant in a precinct.
(c) In addition, a county board of elections by unanimous vote of all bipartisan majority
vote of its members may appoint any registered voter in the county as emergency election-day
assistant, as long as that voter is otherwise qualified to be a precinct official. The State Board of
Elections shall determine for each election the number of emergency election-day assistants each
county may have, based on population, expected turnout, and complexity of election duties. The
county board by unanimous vote of all bipartisan majority vote of its members may assign
emergency election-day assistants on the day of the election to any precinct in the county where
the number of precinct officials is insufficient because of an emergency occurring within 48 hours
of the opening of the polls that prevents an appointed precinct official from serving. A person
appointed to serve as emergency election-day assistant shall be trained and paid like other
precinct assistants in accordance with G.S. 163-46. A county board of elections shall apportion
Page 6 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the appointments as emergency election-day assistant among registrants of each political party
so as to make possible the staffing of each precinct with officials of more than one party, and the
county board shall make assignments so that no precinct has precinct officials all of whom are
registered affiliated with or recommended by the same party.
…."

PART IV. DIGITAL PHOTO IDENTIFICATION
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 163-166.16(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Photo Identification Required to Vote. – When a registered voter presents to vote in
person, the registered voter shall produce any of the following forms of identification that contain
a photograph of the registered voter:
(1) Any of the following that is valid and unexpired, or has been expired for one
year or less:
a. A North Carolina drivers license.
b. A special identification card Special identification for nonoperators
issued under G.S. 20-37.7 or other form of nontemporary
identification issued by the Division of Motor Vehicles of the
Department of Transportation.
c. A United States passport.
d. A North Carolina voter photo identification card of the registered voter
issued pursuant to G.S. 163-82.8A.
e. Recodified as sub-subdivision (a)(2)c. of this section by Session Laws
2019-22, s. 1, effective June 3, 2019.
f. Reserved.
g. A student identification card Student identification issued by a
constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, a
community college, as defined in G.S. 115D-2(2), or eligible private
postsecondary institution as defined in G.S. 116-280(3), provided that
card identification is issued in accordance with G.S. 163-166.17.
h. An employee identification card Employee identification issued by a
state or local government entity, including a charter school, provided
that card identification is issued in accordance with G.S. 163-166.18.
i. A drivers Drivers license or special identification card for
nonoperators issued by another state, the District of Columbia, or a
territory or commonwealth of the United States, but only if the voter's
voter registration was within 90 days of the election.
(2) Any of the following, regardless of whether the identification contains a
printed expiration or issuance date:
a. A military identification card Military identification issued by the
United States government.
b. A Veterans Identification Card issued by the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs for use at Veterans Administration medical
facilities.
c. A tribal enrollment card Tribal enrollment identification issued by a
State or federal recognized tribe.
d. An identification card Identification issued by a department, agency,
or entity of the United States government or this State for a
government program of public assistance.
…."
SECTION 4.2. G.S. 163-166.17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-166.17. Approval of student identification cards for voting identification.
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) The State Board shall approve the use of student identification cards identifications
issued by a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, a community college, as
defined in G.S. 115D-2(2), or eligible private postsecondary institution as defined in
G.S. 116-280(3) for voting identification under G.S. 163-166.16 if the following criteria are met:
(1) The chancellor, president, or registrar of the university or college submits
documentation satisfactory to the State Board that the following have been
met and will not knowingly be violated with regard to student identification
cards identifications issued during the approval period:
a. The identification cards identifications that are issued by the university
or college contain photographs of students obtained by the university
or college or its agents or contractors, provided the photograph
obtained (i) is a frontal image that includes the student's face and (ii)
represents a clear, accurate likeness of the student to whom the
identification card is issued. If the photograph is one not produced by
the university or college or its agents, the university or college shall
certify in detail the process used by the university or college to ensure
the photograph is that of the student to whom the identification card is
issued and shall certify that the process is designed to confirm the
identity of the student to whom the identification card is issued.
b. The identification cards identifications are issued after an enrollment
or other process that includes one or more methods of confirming the
identity of the student using information that may include, but are not
limited to, the social security number, citizenship status, and birthdate
of the student.
c. Access to the equipment for producing the identification cards
identifications is restricted through security measures.
d. Misuse of the equipment for producing the identification cards
identifications would be grounds for student discipline or termination
of an employee.
e. University or college officials would report any misuse of student
identification card production equipment they have knowledge of to
law enforcement if G.S. 163-82.8(19) was potentially violated.
f. The cards identifications issued by the university or college on or after
January 1, 2021, contain a date of expiration.
g. The university or college will provide copies of student identification
cards identifications to the State Board to assist with training purposes.
h. The college or university will provide to students who are issued the
student identification card a copy of, or an electronic link to, a
document developed by the State Board that details the requirements
related to identification for voting; the requirements to vote absentee,
early, or on election day; a description of voting by provisional ballot;
and the availability of a free North Carolina voter photo identification
card pursuant to G.S. 163-82.8A to rural, military, veteran, elderly,
underserved, minority, or other communities as determined by local
needs; and the requirements of North Carolina residency to vote,
including applicable intent requirements of North Carolina law, and
the penalty for voting in multiple states.
…
(b) The State Board shall establish a schedule for such submissions and approvals. The
State Board shall permit a university or college with no changes to the prior election cycle's
approval to submit a statement indicating no changes have been made by the university or
Page 8 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
college. When the State Board approves for use the student identification cards identifications
issued by a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, a community college, as
defined in G.S. 115D-2(2), or eligible private postsecondary institution as defined in
G.S. 116-280(3), for voting identification purposes under G.S. 163-166.16, such approval shall
be valid for the period from January 1 of an odd-numbered year through December 31 of the next
even-numbered year.
(c) The State Board shall produce a list of participating universities and colleges every
two years. The list shall be published on the State Board's Web site and distributed to every
county board of elections. The State Board shall publish sample student identification cards
identifications for each participating university and college.
(d) If a participating college or university with a student identification card approved for
use by the State Board as provided in subsection (b) of this section changes the design of the
student identification card, identification, that college or university shall provide copies of the
new design of the student identification cards to the State Board to assist with training purposes."
SECTION 4.3. G.S. 163-166.18 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-166.18. Approval of employee identification cards for voting identification.
(a) The State Board shall approve the use of employee identification cards identifications
issued by a state or local government entity, including a charter school, for voting identification
under G.S. 163-166.16 if the following criteria are met:
(1) The head elected official or lead human resources employee of the state or
local government entity or charter school submits documentation satisfactory
to the State Board that the following true have been met and will not
knowingly be violated with regard to employee identification cards
identifications issued during the approval period:
a. The identification cards identifications that are issued by the state or
local government entity or charter school contain photographs of the
employees obtained by the state or local government entity or charter
school employing entity or its agents or contractors, provided the
photograph obtained (i) is a frontal image that includes the employee's
face and (ii) represents a clear, accurate likeness of the employee to
whom the identification card is issued. If the photograph is one not
produced by the state or local government entity or charter school, the
state or local government entity or charter school shall certify in detail
the process used by the state or local government entity or charter
school to ensure the photograph is that of the employee to whom the
identification card is issued and shall certify that the process is
designed to confirm the identity of the employee to whom the
identification card is issued.
b. The identification cards identifications are issued after an employment
application or other process that includes one or more methods of
confirming the identity of the employee using information that
include, but are not limited to, the social security number, citizenship
status, and birthdate of the employee.
c. Access to the equipment for producing the identification cards
identifications is restricted through security measures.
d. Misuse of the equipment for producing the identification cards
identifications would be grounds for termination of an employee.
e. State or local or charter school officials would report any misuse of
identification card production equipment they have knowledge of to
law enforcement if G.S. 163-275(19) was potentially violated.
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
f. The cards identifications issued by the state or local government entity
or charter school on or after January 1, 2021, contain a date of
expiration.
g. The state or local government entity or charter school will provide
copies of employee identification cards identifications to the State
Board to assist with training purposes.
…
(b) The State Board shall establish a schedule for such submissions and approvals. The
State Board shall permit a State or local government entity or charter school with no changes to
the prior election cycle's approval to submit a statement indicating no changes have been made
by the State or local government entity or charter school. When the State Board approves for use
the employee identification cards identifications issued by a state or local government entity,
including a charter school, for voting identification under G.S. 163-166.16, such approval shall
be valid for the period from January 1 of an odd-numbered year through December 31 of the next
even-numbered year.
(c) The State Board shall produce a list of participating employing entities every two
years. The list shall be published on the State Board's Web site and distributed to every county
board of elections. The State Board shall publish sample employee identification cards
identifications for each participating State or local government entity or charter school."

PART V. CLARIFY ELIGIBILITY DURING EARLY VOTING
SECTION 5.1. G.S. 163-55 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) Qualifications Determined Upon Voting. – Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, a voter shall not be subject to challenge if the voter was qualified to cast the
ballot at the time it was received by the county board; provided, however, that a voter who casts
a ballot in a general election before turning 18 years of age but who will be 18 years of age as of
the date of the general election shall not be disqualified on account of age."

PART VI. AUTHORITY FOR COUNTY BOARD-INITIATED VOTER CHALLENGES
SECTION 6.1. Article 8 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 163-90.4. Challenges by county boards.
(a) After each election, the State Board shall conduct a uniform, statewide audit to
identify ballots cast during early voting and by absentee ballot in the election that are ineligible
to be counted for one of the reasons identified in G.S. 163-87, as evidenced by official
government database records. The State Board shall distribute the results of this audit to the
county boards by 5:00 P.M. on the fourth business day before the canvass.
(b) The county board shall review the audit produced by the State Board pursuant to this
section, analyze the records of county voters identified in the audit, and, by 5:00 P.M. on the
third business day before the canvass, serve a challenge on any county voter identified in the
audit who the county board has determined has cast an ineligible ballot. The county board shall
conduct the challenge proceedings under the applicable provisions of G.S. 163-89."

PART VII. CLARIFY DEADLINES FOR LATE BALLOT CHANGES
SECTION 7.1. G.S. 163-22(k) reads as rewritten:
"(k) Notwithstanding the provisions contained in Article 20 or Article 21A of this Chapter,
the State Board shall be authorized, by resolution adopted prior to the printing of the primary
ballots, to reduce the time by which absentee ballots are required to be printed and distributed
for the primary election from 50 days to 45 days. This authority shall not be authorized for
absentee ballots to be voted in the general election, except if the law requires ballots to be
available for mailing 60 days before the general election, and the absentee ballots are not ready
Page 10 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
by that date, the State Board shall allow the counties to mail absentee ballots out as soon as the
absentee ballots are available.days, if unforeseen circumstances make compliance with the
50-day deadline impracticable."
SECTION 7.2. G.S. 163-113 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-113. Nominee's right to withdraw as candidate.
A person who has been declared the nominee of a political party for a specified office under
the provisions of G.S. 163-182.15 or G.S. 163-110, shall not be permitted to resign as a candidate
unless, prior to the first day on which military and overseas absentee ballots are transmitted to
voters under Article 21A of this Chapter, that [the] person submits to the board of elections which
certified the nomination a written request that person be permitted to withdraw. For the election
of presidential electors under Article 18 of this Chapter, if a candidate is nominated by a political
party, only the political party making the nomination may withdraw the nomination, and for any
such withdrawal to be effective, the political party executive committee shall certify the
withdrawal in writing to the State Board before the first day on which military and overseas
absentee ballots are transmitted to voters under Article 21A of this Chapter."
SECTION 7.3. G.S. 163-114(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) If any person nominated as a candidate of a political party for one of the offices listed
below (either in a primary or convention or by virtue of having no opposition in a primary) dies,
resigns, or for any reason becomes ineligible or disqualified before the date of the ensuing general
election, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment according to the following instructions:
…
The party executive making a nomination in accordance with the provisions of this section shall
certify the name of its nominee to the chairman of the board of elections, State or county, that
has jurisdiction over the ballot item under G.S. 163-182.4. If at the time a nomination is made
under this section the general election ballots have already been printed, the provisions of
G.S. 163-165.3(c) shall apply. If a vacancy occurs in a nomination of a political party and that
vacancy arises from a cause other than death and the vacancy in nomination occurs more than
120 days before the general election, the vacancy in nomination may be filled under this section
only if the appropriate executive committee certifies the name of the nominee in accordance with
this paragraph at least 75 days before the general election."
SECTION 7.4. G.S. 163-115 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-115. Special provisions for obtaining nominations when vacancies occur in certain
offices.
(a) If a vacancy occurs in the office of the clerk of superior court, otherwise than by
expiration of the term, or if the people fail to elect, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in Sec.
9(3) of Article IV of the North Carolina Constitution. If the vacancy occurs after the time for
filing notice of candidacy in the primary has expired in a year when a regular election is not being
held to elect a clerk of the superior court by expiration of term, then the county executive
committee of each political party shall nominate a candidate whose name shall appear on the
general election ballot. candidate, subject to the deadlines in G.S. 163-115.5. The candidate
elected in the general election shall serve the unexpired portion of the term of the person causing
the vacancy.
…
(c) If a vacancy occurs in an elective State or district office (other than member of the
United States House of Representatives) during the period opening 10 days before the filing
period for the office ends and closing 30 days before the ensuing general election, a nomination
shall be made by the proper executive committee of each political party as provided in
G.S. 163-114, and the names of the nominees shall be printed on the general election
ballots.ballots, subject to the deadline in G.S. 163-115.5.
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) If a vacancy occurs on a county board of commissioners and G.S. 153A-27 or
G.S. 153A-27.1 requires that a person shall be elected to the seat vacated for the remainder of
the unexpired term, and the vacancy occurs:
(1) Beginning on the tenth day before the filing period ends under G.S. 163-106.2,
a nomination shall be made by the county executive committee of each
political party and the names of the nominees shall be printed on the general
election ballots.ballots, subject to the deadline in G.S. 163-115.5.
(2) Prior to the tenth day before the filing period ends under G.S. 163-106.2,
nominations shall be made by primary election as provided by this Article.
(e) If a vacancy occurs in the office of United States Senator, and the vacancy occurs:
(1) Beginning on the tenth day before the filing period ends under G.S. 163-106.2,
a nomination shall be made by the State executive committee of each political
party and the names of the nominees shall be printed on the general election
ballots.ballots, subject to the deadline in G.S. 163-115.5.
(2) Prior to the tenth day before the filing period ends under G.S. 163-106.2,
nominations shall be made by primary election as provided by this Article."
SECTION 7.5. Article 10 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 163-115.5. Removing, replacing, or adding candidates on the general election ballot.
(a) The board of elections with jurisdiction over a ballot item under G.S. 163-182.4 shall
remove a candidate from the general election ballot only if the board of elections is notified, no
later than 20 days before absentee ballots are authorized for distribution for the general election,
that the candidate has died, withdrawn, or for any reason has become ineligible or disqualified.
Except as provided in G.S. 163-113, either the candidate or the relevant executive committee of
the candidate's political party, if the candidate is a nominee of the party, may provide the
notification required by this section. For any nominee authorized to be replaced on the ballot
pursuant to law, the nominee's name shall be replaced on the ballot only if the replacement has
been certified pursuant to law to the board of elections with jurisdiction over the ballot item no
later than 20 days before absentee ballots are authorized for distribution for the election. If a
withdrawal, disqualification, or replacement occurs later than 20 days before absentee ballots are
authorized for distribution for the general election, the provisions of G.S. 163-165.3(c) shall
apply.
(b) When a vacancy in office occurs and that vacancy requires an election to fill the
unexpired term without a candidate filing period, any nominees authorized for the election shall
be certified to the board of elections with jurisdiction over a ballot item under G.S. 163-182.4 no
later than eight days before absentee ballots are authorized for distribution for the election.
(c) The provisions of G.S. 103-5(a) shall not apply to this section."
SECTION 7.6. G.S. 163-122 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(f) If any candidate authorized to have the candidate's name printed on the general
election ballot pursuant to this section dies, withdraws, or for any reason becomes ineligible or
disqualified before the general election, the provisions of G.S. 163-115.5 shall apply."
SECTION 7.7. G.S. 163-165.3(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Late Changes in Ballots. – The State Board shall promulgate rules for late changes in
ballots. The rules shall provide for the reprinting, where practical, of official ballots as a result
of replacement candidates to fill vacancies in accordance with G.S. 163-114 or other late
changes. If an official ballot is not reprinted, a vote If a board of elections having jurisdiction
over a ballot item is notified of a candidate withdrawal, disqualification, or replacement after the
deadline in G.S. 163-115.5 but before the deadline in G.S. 163-113, votes for a candidate
removed without replacement shall not be counted and votes for a candidate who has been
replaced in accordance with G.S. 163-114 will count for the replacement candidate.candidate,
and the affected county boards of elections shall inform all affected voters of these actions. No
Page 12 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
candidate withdrawal or replacement shall be permitted after the deadline in G.S. 163-113. No
additional nominees, where permitted due to vacancies in office, shall be allowed after the
deadline in G.S. 163-115.5."
SECTION 7.8. G.S. 163-227.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-227.10. Date by which absentee ballots must be available for voting.
(a) A board of elections shall provide absentee ballots of the kinds needed 60 days prior
to the statewide general election in even-numbered years and 50 days prior to the date on which
any other election shall be conducted, unless 45 days is authorized by the State Board under
G.S. 163-22(k) or there shall exist an appeal before the State Board or the courts not concluded,
in which case the board shall provide the ballots as quickly as possible upon the conclusion of
such an appeal. Provided, in a presidential election year, the board of elections shall provide
general election ballots no later than three days after nomination of the presidential and vice
presidential candidates if that nomination occurs later than 63 days prior to the statewide general
election and makes compliance with the 60-day deadline impossible. However, in the case of
municipal elections, absentee ballots shall be made available no later than 30 days before an
election. In every instance the board of elections shall exert every effort to provide absentee
ballots, of the kinds needed by the date on which absentee voting is authorized to commence.
(b) The board of elections shall provide absentee ballots, of the kinds needed, as quickly
as possible after the ballot information for a second primary has been determined.For a second
primary, the county board of elections shall provide absentee ballots, of the kinds needed, no
later than 45 days before the second primary.
…."
SECTION 7.9. G.S. 163-229 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-229. Absentee ballots, applications on container-return envelopes, and instruction
sheets.
…
(b) Application on Container-Return Envelope. – In time for use not later than 60 50 days
before a statewide general election in an even-numbered year, and not later than 50 days before
a statewide primary, other general election or county bond election, an election, the county board
of elections shall print a sufficient number of envelopes in which persons casting absentee ballots
may transmit their marked ballots to the county board of elections. However, in the case of
municipal elections, sufficient container-return envelopes shall be made available no later than
30 days before an election. Each container-return envelope shall have printed on it an application
which shall be designed and prescribed by the State Board, providing for all of the following:
…
(c) Instruction Sheets. – In time for use not later than 60 50 days before a statewide
general election in an even-numbered year, and not later than 50 days before a statewide primary
or general election or county bond election, an election, the county board of elections shall
prepare and print a sufficient number of sheets of instructions on how voters are to prepare
absentee ballots and return them to the county board of elections. The instruction sheets shall
include the means by which the voter's marked absentee ballot must be returned to the county
board of elections and the date and time that the ballot must be received by the county board of
elections. However, in the case of municipal elections, instruction sheets shall be made available
no later than 30 days before an election."
SECTION 7.10. G.S. 163-230.1(c), as amended by Section 3A.4(f) of S.L. 2024-57,
reads as rewritten:
"(c) Delivery of Absentee Ballots and Container-Return Envelope to Applicant. – When
the county board receives a completed request form for applications and absentee ballots from
the voter, or the near relative or the verifiable legal guardian of that voter, the county board shall
promptly issue and transmit them to the voter in accordance with the following instructions:
…
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The county board may receive completed written request forms for applications at any time
prior to the election but shall not mail applications and absentee ballots to the voter or issue
applications and absentee ballots in person earlier than 60 days prior to the statewide general
election in an even-numbered year, or earlier than 50 days prior to any other before an election.
No election official shall issue applications for absentee ballots except in compliance with this
Article."
SECTION 7.11. G.S. 163-258.9(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Not later than 60 days before the statewide general election in even-numbered years
and not later than 50 days before any other election, except for a second primary, the county
board of elections shall transmit a ballot and balloting materials to all covered voters who by that
date submit a valid military-overseas ballot application, except for a second primary. Provided,
in a presidential election year, the board of elections shall provide general election ballots no
later than three days after nomination of the presidential and vice presidential candidates if that
nomination occurs later than 63 days prior to the statewide general election and makes
compliance with the 60-day deadline impossible. unless 45 days is authorized by the State Board
under G.S. 163-22(k) or there exists an appeal before the State Board or the courts that has not
concluded, in which case the county board shall provide the ballots as quickly as possible upon
the conclusion of that appeal. However, in the case of municipal elections, absentee ballots shall
be made available no later than 30 days before an election. For a second primary which includes
a candidate for federal office, primary, the county board of elections shall transmit a ballot and
balloting material to all covered voters who by that date submit a valid military-overseas ballot
application no later than 45 days before the second primary. For a second primary which does
not include a candidate for federal office, the transmission of the ballot and ballot materials shall
be as soon as practicable and shall be transmitted electronically no later than three business days
and by mail no later than 15 days from the date the appropriate board of elections orders that the
second primary be held pursuant to G.S. 163-111. If additional offices are added to the ballot to
fill a vacancy occurring after the deadline provided by this subsection, those ballots shall be
transmitted as soon as practicable."
SECTION 7.12. G.S. 163-294.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) If a candidate for political party nomination for office dies, becomes disqualified, or
withdraws before the primary but after the ballots have been printed, the provisions of
G.S. 163-112 shall govern.
If a candidate for nomination in a nonpartisan municipal primary dies, becomes disqualified,
or withdraws before the primary but after the ballots have been printed, the board of elections
shall determine whether or not there is time to reprint the ballots. If the board determines that
there is not enough time to reprint the ballots, the deceased or disqualified candidate's name shall
remain on the ballots. If he receives enough votes for nomination, such votes shall be disregarded
and the candidate receiving the next highest number of votes below the number necessary for
nomination shall be declared nominated. If the death or disqualification of the candidate leaves
only two candidates for each office to be filled, the nonpartisan primary shall not be held and all
candidates shall be declared nominees.
If a nominee for political party nomination dies, becomes disqualified, or withdraws after the
primary and before election day, the provisions of G.S. 163-114 G.S. 163-114 and
G.S. 163-115.5 shall govern.
If a candidate in a nonpartisan election dies, becomes disqualified, or withdraws before
election day and after the ballots have been printed, the board of elections shall determine
whether there is enough time to reprint the ballots. day, the provisions of G.S. 163-115.5 shall
govern. If there is not enough time to reprint the ballots, the board of elections is notified of a
candidate's death or disqualification after the relevant deadline in G.S. 163-115.5, and should the
deceased or disqualified candidate receive enough votes to be elected, the board of elections shall
declare the office vacant, and it shall be filled as provided by law."
Page 14 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART VIII. DEADLINE FOR PRESIDENTIAL NOMINATIONS
SECTION 8.1. G.S. 163-209(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The names of candidates for electors of President and Vice-President nominated by
any political party recognized in this State under G.S. 163-96, or nominated under G.S. 163-1(c)
by a candidate for President of the United States who has qualified to have his or her name printed
on the general election ballot as an unaffiliated candidate under G.S. 163-122, shall be filed with
the Secretary of State no later than 60 days before the general election but shall not be printed on
the ballot. In the case of the unaffiliated candidate, the names of candidates for electors must be
filed with the Secretary of State no later than 12:00 noon on the first Friday in August. In place
of their names, there shall be printed on the ballot the names of the candidates for President and
Vice-President of each political party recognized in this State, and the name of any candidate for
President who has qualified to have his or her name printed on the general election ballot under
G.S. 163-122. A candidate for President who has qualified for the general election ballot as an
unaffiliated candidate under G.S. 163-122 shall, no later than 12:00 noon on the first Friday in
August, file with the State Board of Elections the name of a candidate for Vice-President, whose
name shall also be printed on the ballot. The names of the candidates for President and
Vice-President nominated by any political party recognized in this State under G.S. 163-96 or
who has qualified as an unaffiliated candidate under G.S. 163-122 shall be filed with the State
Board no later than 60 days before the general election, and those names filed shall be printed on
the ballot. A vote for the candidates named on the ballot shall be a vote for the electors of the
party or unaffiliated candidate by which those candidates were nominated and whose names have
been filed with the Secretary of State."

PART IX. INCREASE THRESHOLD FOR REPORTING CERTAIN CONTRIBUTIONS
SECTION 9.1. G.S. 163-278.10A reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-278.10A. Threshold of $1,000 $3,000 for financial reports for certain candidates.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, a candidate for a district court
judge, superior court judge, county office, municipal office, local school board office, soil and
water conservation district board of supervisors, or sanitary district board shall be exempted from
the reports of contributions, loans, and expenditures required in G.S. 163-278.9(a), 163-278.40B,
163-278.40C, 163-278.40D, and 163-278.40E if to further the candidate's campaign that
candidate:
(1) Does not receive more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) three thousand
dollars ($3,000) in contributions, and
(2) Does not receive more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) three thousand
dollars ($3,000) in loans, and
(3) Does not spend more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).three thousand
dollars ($3,000).
To qualify for the exemption from those reports, the candidate's treasurer shall file a certification
that the candidate does not intend to receive in contributions or loans or expend more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) three thousand dollars ($3,000) to further the candidate's campaign.
The certification shall be filed with the Board at the same time the candidate files the candidate's
Organizational Report as required in G.S. 163-278.7, G.S. 163-278.9, and G.S. 163-278.40A. If
the candidate's campaign is being conducted by a political committee which is handling all
contributions, loans, and expenditures for the candidate's campaign, the treasurer of the political
committee shall file a certification of intent to stay within the threshold amount. If the intent to
stay within the threshold changes, or if the one-thousand-dollar ($1,000) three-thousand-dollar
($3,000) threshold is exceeded, the treasurer shall immediately notify the Board and shall be
responsible for filing all reports required in G.S. 163-278.9 and 163-278.40B, 163-278.40C,
163-278.40D, and 163-278.40E; provided that any contribution, loan, or expenditure which
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
would have been required to be reported on an earlier report but for this section shall be included
on the next report required after the intent changes or the threshold is exceeded.
…."

PART X. INCREASE THRESHOLD FOR REPORTING INDEPENDENT
EXPENDITURES
SECTION 10.1. G.S. 163-278.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-278.12. Special reporting of contributions and independent expenditures.
(a) Subject to G.S. 163-278.39 and G.S. 163-278.14, individuals and other entities not
otherwise prohibited from doing so may make independent expenditures. In the event an
individual, person, or other entity making independent expenditures but not otherwise required
to report them makes independent expenditures in excess of one hundred dollars ($100.00),
thousand dollars ($1,000), that individual, person, or entity shall file a statement of such
independent expenditure with the appropriate board of elections in the manner prescribed by the
State Board of Elections.
…
(d) Contributions or independent expenditures required to be reported under this section
shall be reported within 30 days after they exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) thousand dollars
($1,000) or 10 days before an election the contributions or independent expenditures affect,
whichever occurs earlier.
…."

PART XI. PROHIBIT PAYMENT PER SIGNATURE FOR PETITIONS
SECTION 11.1. G.S. 163-221 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-221. Persons may not sign name of another to petition.Prohibited petition activities.
(a) No person may sign the name of another person to any of the following:
(1) Any petition calling for an election or referendum.
(2) Any petition under G.S. 163-96 for the formulation of a new political party.
(3) Any petition under G.S. 163-107.1 requesting a person to be a candidate.
(4) Any petition under G.S. 163-122 to have the name of an unaffiliated candidate
placed on the general election ballot, or under G.S. 163-296 to have the name
of an unaffiliated or nonpartisan candidate placed on the regular municipal
election ballot.
(5) Any petition under G.S. 163-213.5 to place a name on the ballot under the
Presidential Preference Primary Act.
(6) Any petition under G.S. 163-123 to qualify as a write-in candidate.
(b) Any name signed on a petition, in violation of this section, shall be void.
(b1) No person may be compensated based on the number of signatures collected for a
petition.
(c) Any person who willfully violates this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 11.2. G.S. 163-274(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Class 2 Misdemeanors. – Any person who shall, in connection with any primary or
election in this State, do any of the acts and things declared in this subsection to be unlawful,
shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. It shall be unlawful to do any of the following:
…
(17) For any person to be compensated based on the number of signatures obtained
on a petition authorized under this Chapter."

PART XII. UNIFORMITY FOR REVIEW OF PETITION SIGNATURES
SECTION 12.1. G.S. 163-96 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-96. "Political party" defined; creation of new party.
Page 16 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Definition. – A political party within the meaning of the election laws of this State
shall be one of the following:
…
(2) Any group of voters which shall have filed with the State Board of Elections
petitions for the formulation of a new political party which are signed by
registered and qualified voters in this State equal in number to one-quarter of
one percent (0.25%) of the total number of voters who voted in the most recent
general election for Governor. Also the petition must be signed by at least 200
registered voters from each of three congressional districts in North Carolina.
To be effective, the petitioners must file their petitions with the State Board
of Elections before 12:00 noon on the first day of June May preceding the day
on which is to be held the first general State election in which the new political
party desires to participate. The State Board of Elections shall forthwith
determine the sufficiency of petitions filed with it and shall immediately
communicate its determination to the State chair of the proposed new political
party.
…
(b) Petitions for New Political Party. – Petitions for the creation of a new political party
shall be on a form prescribed by the State Board and contain on the heading of each page of the
petition in bold print or all in capital letters the words: "THE UNDERSIGNED REGISTERED
VOTERS IN ____ COUNTY HEREBY PETITION FOR THE FORMATION OF A NEW
POLITICAL PARTY TO BE NAMED ____ AND WHOSE STATE CHAIRMAN IS ______,
RESIDING AT ______ AND WHO CAN BE REACHED BY TELEPHONE AT ____."
All printing required to appear on the heading of the petition shall be in type no smaller than 10
point or in all capital letters, double spaced typewriter size. In addition to the form of the petition,
the organizers and petition circulators shall inform the signers of the general purpose and intent
of the new party.
The petitions must specify the name selected for the proposed political party. The State Board
of Elections shall reject petitions for the formation of a new party if the name chosen contains
any word that appears in the name of any existing political party recognized in this State or if, in
the State Board's opinion, the name is so similar to that of an existing political party recognized
in this State as to confuse or mislead the voters at an election.
The petitions must state the name and address of the State chairman of the proposed new
political party.
(c) Each petition shall be presented to the chairman of the board of elections of the county
in which the signatures were obtained, and it shall be the chairman's duty:
(1) To examine the signatures on the petition and place a check mark on the
petition by the name of each signer who is qualified and registered to vote in
his county.
(2) To attach to the petition his signed certificate
a. Stating that the signatures on the petition have been checked against
the registration records and
b. Indicating the number found qualified and registered to vote in his
county.
(3) To return each petition, together with the certificate required by the preceding
subdivision, to the person who presented it to him for checking.
The group of petitioners shall submit the petitions to the chairman of the county board of
elections in the county in which the signatures were obtained no later than 5:00 P.M. on the
fifteenth thirtieth day preceding the date the petitions are due to be filed with the State Board of
Elections as provided in subsection [subdivision] (a)(2) of this section. Provided the petitions are
timely submitted, the chairman of the county board of elections shall proceed to examine and
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
verify the signatures under the provisions of this subsection. Verification shall be completed
within two four weeks from the date such petitions are presented."
SECTION 12.2. G.S. 163-122(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Procedure for Having Name Printed on Ballot as Unaffiliated Candidate. – Any
qualified voter who seeks to have the voter's name printed on the general election ballot as an
unaffiliated candidate shall:
(1) If the office is a statewide office, file written petitions with the State Board of
Elections supporting the voter's candidacy for a specified office. These
petitions must be filed with the State Board of Elections on or before 12:00
noon on the day of the primary election 5:00 P.M. on the twentieth business
day after canvass of the primary and must be signed by qualified voters of the
State equal in number to one and a half percent (1.5%) of the total number of
voters who voted in the most recent general election for Governor. Also, the
petition must be signed by at least 200 registered voters from each of three
congressional districts in North Carolina. The State Board shall determine the
sufficiency of petitions filed with the State Board and shall immediately
communicate its determination to the petitioning candidate. The petitions shall
be divided into sections based on the county in which the signatures were
obtained. No later than 12:00 P.M. on the day of the primary election, each
petition shall be presented to the board of elections of the county in which the
signatures were obtained. A petition present to a county board of elections
shall contain only names of voters registered in that county. Provided the
petitions are timely filed, the State Board of Elections shall require the filed
petition be verified no later than 15 business days after canvass of the primary
in one of the following ways:
a. The Executive Director shall examine the names on the petition and
place a check mark on the petition by the name of each signer who is
qualified and registered to vote in the designated county and shall
attach to the petition a signed certificate. Said certificates shall state
that the signatures on the petition have been checked against the
registration records and shall indicate the number of signers to be
qualified and registered to vote in each county.
b. The submitted, the chair of the county board of elections shall examine
the names on the petition and place a check mark on the petition by
the name of each signer who is qualified and registered to vote in the
chair's county and shall attach to the petition the chair's signed
certificate. Said certificates shall state that the signatures on the
petition have been checked against the registration records and shall
indicate the number of signers to be qualified and registered to vote in
the chair's county. The chair shall return the petition and certificate to
the State Board.person who presented it to the chair for checking. The
chair shall complete the verification no later than 15 business days
after the canvass of the primary.
The State Board shall return a copy of each petition, together with a copy of
the certificate required in this section, to the person who presented it to the
State Board.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection, if the office is a district office under the
jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections under G.S. 163-182.4(b), file
written petitions with the State Board of Elections supporting that voter's
candidacy for a specified office. For district offices other than General
Assembly seats, petitions must be filed with the State Board of Elections on
Page 18 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or before 12:00 noon on the day of the primary election 5:00 P.M. on the
twentieth business day after canvass of the primary and must be signed by
qualified voters of the district equal in number to one and a half percent (1.5%)
of the total number of registered voters in the district as reflected by the voter
registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1 of the year
in which the general election is to be held. For General Assembly seats in
which the district lies in more than one county, petitions must be filed with
the State Board of Elections on or before 12:00 noon on the day of the primary
election 5:00 P.M. on the twentieth business day after canvass of the primary
and must be signed by qualified voters of the district equal in number to four
percent (4%) of the total number of registered voters in the district as reflected
by the voter registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January
1 of the year in which the general election is to be held. The State Board shall
determine the sufficiency of petitions filed with the State Board and shall
immediately communicate its determination to the petitioning candidate. The
petitions shall be divided into sections based on the county in which the
signatures were obtained. The petitions shall be verified as specified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) If the office is a county office or a single county legislative district, file written
petitions with the chair or director of the county board of elections supporting
the voter's candidacy for a specified county office. These petitions must be
filed with the county board of elections on or before 12:00 noon on the day of
the primary election and must be signed by qualified voters of the county equal
in number to four percent (4%) of the total number of registered voters in the
county as reflected by the voter registration records of the State Board of
Elections as of January 1 of the year in which the general election is to be
held, except if the office is for a district consisting of less than the entire
county and only the voters in that district vote for that office, the petitions
must be signed by qualified voters of the district equal in number to four
percent (4%) of the total number of voters in the district according to the voter
registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1 of the year
in which the general election is to be held. Each petition shall be presented to
the chair or director of the county board of elections. The chair or director of
the county board of elections shall verify the filed petition no later than 15
business days after canvass as provided in sub-subdivision b. of subdivision
(1) of this subsection, and shall return a copy of each petition, together with a
copy of the certificate required in this section, to the person who presented it
to the county board of elections.subsection.
(4) If the office is a partisan municipal office, file written petitions with the chair
or director of the county board of elections in the county wherein the
municipality is located supporting the voter's candidacy for a specified
municipal office. These petitions must be filed with the county board of
elections on or before the time and date specified in G.S. 163-296 12:00 P.M.
on the day of the primary and must be signed by the number of qualified voters
specified in G.S. 163-296. The chair or director of the county board of
elections shall verify the filed petition no later than 15 business days after
canvass the primary and shall otherwise proceed as provided in
sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (1) of this subsection, and shall return a copy
of each petition, together with a copy of the certificate required in this section,
to the person who presented it to the county board of elections.subsection.
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) If the office is a superior court judge or a district court judge, regardless of
whether the district lies entirely in one county or in more than one county, file
written petitions with the State Board of Elections supporting that voter's
candidacy for a specified office. These petitions must be filed with the State
Board of Elections on or before 12:00 noon on the day of the primary election
5:00 P.M. on the twentieth business day after canvass of the primary and must
be signed by qualified voters of the district equal in number to two percent
(2%) of the total number of registered voters in the district as reflected by the
voter registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1 of
the year in which the general election is to be held. The State Board shall
determine the sufficiency of the petitions filed with the State Board and shall
immediately communicate its determination to the petitioning candidate. The
petitions shall be divided into sections based on the county in which the
signatures were obtained. The petitions shall be verified as specified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
Upon compliance with the provisions of subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this
subsection, the board of elections with which the petitions have been timely filed shall cause the
unaffiliated candidate's name to be printed on the general election ballots in accordance with
Article 14A of this Chapter."
SECTION 12.3. G.S. 163-296 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-296. Nomination by petition.
In cities conducting partisan elections, any qualified voter who seeks to have his name printed
on the regular municipal election ballot as an unaffiliated candidate may do so in the manner
provided in G.S. 163-122, except that the petitions and affidavits shall be filed not later than
12:00 noon on the Friday preceding the seventh Saturday before the election, and the petitions
shall be signed by a number of qualified voters of the municipality equal to at least one and a half
percent (1.5%) of the whole number of voters qualified to vote in the municipal election
according to the voter registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1 of the
year in which the general municipal election is held. A person whose name appeared on the ballot
in a primary election is not eligible to have his name placed on the regular municipal election
ballot as an unaffiliated candidate for the same office in that year. The State Board of Elections
shall examine and verify the signatures on the petition, and shall certify only the names of signers
who are found to be qualified registered voters in the municipality. Provided that in the case
where a qualified voter seeks to have his name printed on the regular municipal election ballot
as an unaffiliated candidate for election from an election district within the municipality, the
petition shall be signed by one and a half percent (1.5%) of the voters qualified to vote for that
office."

PART XIII. CAMPAIGN FINANCE PENALTY WAIVER A PREREQUISITE TO
FILING A CONTESTED CASE
SECTION 13.1. G.S. 163-278.34(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Calculation and Assessment. – The State Board shall calculate and assess the amount
of the civil penalty due under subsection (a) or (b) of this section and shall notify the person who
is assessed the civil penalty of the amount. The notice of assessment shall be served by any means
authorized under G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4, and shall direct Rule 4. For a civil penalty assessed under
subsection (a) of this section, the notice of assessment shall direct the violator to either pay the
assessment or request a good-cause waiver of the assessment under subsection (d) of this section
within 60 days. If the State Board does not find good cause for a waiver, the State Board shall
send notice by any means authorized under G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4, directing the violator either to pay
the assessment or to contest the assessment within 30 days by filing a petition for a contested
case under Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. For a civil penalty assessed under
Page 20 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subsection (b) of this section, the notice of assessment shall direct the violator either to pay the
assessment or contest the assessment within 30 days by filing a petition for a contested case under
Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If a violator does not pay a civil penalty
assessed by the State Board within 30 days after it is due, the State Board shall request the
Attorney General to institute a civil action to recover the amount of the assessment. The civil
action may be brought in the superior court of any county where the report was due to be filed or
any county where the violator resides or maintains an office. A civil action must be filed within
three years of the date the assessment was due. An assessment that is not contested is due when
the violator is served with a notice of assessment. An assessment that is contested is due at the
conclusion of the administrative and judicial review of the assessment. The State Board of
Elections shall pay the clear proceeds of civil penalties collected under this section to the Civil
Penalty and Forfeiture Fund pursuant to G.S. 115C-457.2. The State Board of Elections shall
reduce the monies collected by the enforcement costs and the collection costs to determine the
clear proceeds payable to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund. Monies set aside for the costs of
enforcement and the costs of collection shall be credited to accounts of the State Board of
Elections.Board."

PART XIV. CHANGE DATE FOR WHEN CERTAIN MUNICIPAL ELECTIONS HELD
SECTION 14.1. G.S. 163-279(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Primaries and elections for offices filled by election of the people in cities, towns,
incorporated villages, and special districts shall be held in 1973 and every two or four years
thereafter as provided by municipal charter on the following days:
(1) If the election is nonpartisan and decided by simple plurality, the election shall
be held on Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(2) If the election is partisan, the election shall be held on Tuesday after the first
Monday in November, the first primary shall be held on the second Tuesday
after Labor Day, and the second primary, if required, shall be held on the
fourth Tuesday before the election.
(3) If the election is nonpartisan and the nonpartisan primary method of election
is used, the election shall be held on Tuesday after the first Monday in
November and the nonpartisan primary shall be held on the fourth Tuesday
before the election.second Tuesday after Labor Day.
(4) If the election is nonpartisan and the election and runoff election method of
election is used, the election shall be held on the fourth Tuesday before the
Tuesday after the first Monday in November, second Tuesday after Labor
Day, and the runoff election, if required, shall be held on Tuesday after the
first Monday in November."

PART XV. CLARIFY VENUE IN WHICH CERTAIN STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS
MEETINGS HELD
SECTION 15.1. G.S. 163-20, as amended by Section 3A.3(d) of S.L.2024-57, reads
as rewritten:
"§ 163-20. Meetings of Board; quorum; minutes.
…
(b) Place of Meeting. – Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the State
Board shall meet in its offices in the City of Raleigh, or at another place in the City of Raleigh to
be designated by the chair. However, subject to the limitation imposed by allowance as provided
in subsection (c) of this section upon the prior written request of any four members, the State
Board shall meet at any other place in the State designated by the four members.
(c) Meetings to Investigate Alleged Violations of This Chapter. – When called upon to
investigate or hear sworn alleged violations of this Chapter, the State Board shall may meet and
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
hear the matter in the county in which the violations are alleged to have occurred.occurred upon
the prior written request of any three members.
…."

PART XVI. DEADLINE TO CHALLENGE ABSENTEE BALLOTS IN CERTAIN
MUNICIPAL ELECTIONS
SECTION 16.1. G.S. 163-89(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Time for Challenge. – The absentee ballot of any voter received by the county board
of elections pursuant to G.S. 163-231(b)(1) may be challenged no later than 5:00 P.M. on the
fifth business day after the primary or general election or county bond election. election;
provided, however, that any such challenge in a municipal primary or election conducted under
Article 24 of this Chapter, where the canvass is to be held on the seventh day following the
primary or election, shall be filed no later than two business days after the primary or election.
The absentee ballot of any voter received by the county board of elections pursuant to
G.S. 163-231(b)(2) may be challenged no later than 5:00 P.M. on the next business day following
the deadline for receipt of such absentee ballots."

PART XVII. REVISIONS TO VARIOUS STATUTES PERMANENTLY ENJOINED IN
NAACP V. MCCRORY PERTAINING TO: OUT-OF-PRECINCT VOTING;
SAME-DAY REGISTRATION; AND PREREGISTRATION
SECTION 17.1.(a) G.S. 163-55 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-55. Qualifications to vote; exclusion from electoral franchise.
(a) Residence Period for State Elections. – Every person born in the United States, and
every person who has been naturalized, and who shall have resided in the State of North Carolina
and in the precinct precinct, ward, or other election district in which the person offers to vote for
30 days next preceding an election, shall, if otherwise qualified as prescribed in this Chapter, be
qualified to vote in the precinct in which the person resides. any election held in this State.
Removal from one precinct precinct, ward, or other election district to another in this State shall
not operate to deprive any person of the right to vote in the precinct precinct, ward, or other
election district from which the person has removed until 30 days after the person's removal.
Except as provided in this Chapter, the following classes of persons shall not be allowed to
vote in this State:
(1) Persons under 18 years of age.
(2) Any person adjudged guilty of a felony against this State or the United States,
or adjudged guilty of a felony in another state that also would be a felony if it
had been committed in this State, unless that person shall be first restored to
the rights of citizenship in the manner prescribed by law.
(b) Precincts. Precincts and Election Districts. – For purposes of qualification to vote in
an election, a person's residence in a precinct precinct, ward, or other election district shall be
determined in accordance with G.S. 163-57. When an election district encompasses more than
one precinct, then for purposes of those offices to be elected from that election district, a person
shall also be deemed to be a resident in the election district which includes the precinct in which
that person resides. An election district may include a portion of a county, an entire county, a
portion of the State, or the entire State. When a precinct has been divided among two or more
election districts for purposes of elections to certain offices, then with respect to elections to those
offices, a person shall be deemed to be a resident in only that election district which includes the
area of the precinct in which that person resides. Qualification to vote in referenda shall be treated
the same as qualification for elections to fill offices.
…."
SECTION 17.1.(b) G.S. 163-166.11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-166.11. Provisional voting requirements.
Page 22 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
If an individual seeking to vote claims to be a registered voter in a jurisdiction as provided in
G.S. 163-82.1 and though eligible to vote in the election does not appear on the official list of
eligible registered voters in the voting place, that individual may cast a provisional official ballot
as follows:
…
(6) The county board of elections shall count the individual's provisional official
ballot for all ballot items on which it determines that the individual was
eligible under State or federal law to vote."
SECTION 17.1.(c) G.S. 163-182.2(a)(4), as amended by Section 3A.4(e) of S.L.
2024-57, reads as rewritten:
"(4) If the county board finds that an individual voting a provisional official ballot
(i) was registered in the county as provided in 163-82.1, (ii) voted in the proper
precinct under G.S. 163-55 and G.S. 163-57, and (iii) was otherwise eligible
to vote, the provisional official ballots shall be counted by the county board
no later than 5:00 P.M. on the third business day after the election. Except as
provided in G.S. 163-82.15(e), if the county board finds that an individual
voting a provisional official ballot (i) did not vote in the proper precinct under
G.S. 163-55 and G.S. 163-57, (ii) is not registered in the county as provided
in G.S. 163-82.1, or (iii) is otherwise not eligible to vote, the ballot shall not
be counted. Provisional official ballots shall be counted by the county board
no later than 5:00 P.M. on the third business day after the election. If the
county board finds that an individual voting a provisional official ballot is not
eligible to vote in one or more ballot items on the official ballot, the board
shall not count the official ballot in those ballot items but shall count the
official ballot in any ballot items for which the individual is eligible to vote.
Eligibility shall be determined by whether the voter is registered in the county
as provided in G.S. 163-82.1 and whether the voter is qualified by residency
to vote in the election district as provided in G.S. 163-55 and G.S. 163-57. If
a voter was properly registered to vote in the election by the county board, no
mistake of an election official in giving the voter a ballot or in failing to
comply with G.S. 163-82.15 or G.S. 163-166.11 shall serve to prevent the
counting of the vote on any ballot item the voter was eligible by registration
and qualified by residency to vote."
SECTION 17.2.(a) G.S. 163-59 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-59. Right to participate or vote in party primary.
No person shall be entitled to vote or otherwise participate in the primary election of any
political party unless that person complies with all of the following:
(1) Is a registered voter.
(2) Has declared and has had recorded on the registration book or record the fact
that the voter affiliates with the political party in whose primary the voter
proposes to vote or participate.
(3) Is in good faith a member of that party.
Notwithstanding the previous paragraph, any unaffiliated voter who is authorized under
G.S. 163-119 may also vote in the primary if the voter is otherwise eligible to vote in that primary
except for subdivisions (2) and (3) of the previous paragraph.
Any person who will become qualified by age to register and vote in the general election for
which the primary is held, even though not so qualified by the date of the primary, shall be
entitled to register for the primary and general election prior to the primary and then to vote in
the primary after being registered. Such person may register not earlier than 60 days nor later
than the last day for making application to register under G.S. 163-82.6(d) prior to the primary.
In addition, persons who will become qualified by age to register and vote in the general election
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
for which the primary is held, who do not register during the special period may register to vote
after such period as if they were qualified on the basis of age, but until they are qualified by age
to vote, they may vote only in primary elections. The person may also register and vote in the
primary and general election pursuant to G.S. 163-82.6B."
SECTION 17.2.(b) G.S. 163-82.6(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Registration Deadlines for a Primary or Election. – In Except as provided in
G.S. 163-82.6B, in order to be valid for a primary or election, the form:
(1) If submitted by mail, must be postmarked at least 25 days before the primary
or election, except that any mailed application on which the postmark is
missing or unclear is validly submitted if received in the mail not later than 20
days before the primary or election,
(2) If submitted in person, by facsimile transmission, or by transmission of a
scanned document, must be received by the county board of elections by a
time established by that board, but no earlier than 5:00 P.M., on the
twenty-fifth day before the primary or election,
(3) If submitted through a delegatee who violates the duty set forth in subsection
(a) of this section, must be signed by the applicant and given to the delegatee
not later than 25 days before the primary or election, except as provided in
subsection (f) of this section."
SECTION 17.3.(a) G.S. 163-82.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) Preregistration. – A person who is at least 16 years of age but will not be 18 years of
age by the date of the next election and who is otherwise qualified to register may preregister to
vote and shall be automatically registered upon reaching the age of eligibility following
verification of the person's qualifications and address in accordance with G.S. 163-82.7."
SECTION 17.3.(b) G.S. 163-82.3(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(5) Preregister to vote."
SECTION 17.3.(c) G.S. 163-82.4(e)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) The following question questions and statement:
a. "Will you be 18 years of age on or before election day?" and boxes for
the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant will be 18
years of age or older on election day.
b. "Are you at least 16 years of age and understand that you must be 18
years of age on or before election day to vote?" and boxes for the
applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant is at least 16 years
of age and understands that the applicant must be at least 18 years of
age or older by election day to vote.
c. "If you checked "no' in response to this question, both of these
questions, do not submit this form.""
SECTION 17.3.(d) G.S. 163-82.19(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Voter Registration at Drivers License Offices. – The Division of Motor Vehicles
shall, pursuant to the rules adopted by the State Board of Elections, Board, modify its forms so
that any eligible person who applies for original issuance, renewal or correction of a drivers
license, or special identification card issued under G.S. 20-37.7 may, on a part of the form,
complete an application to register to vote, or to update the voter's registration if the voter has
changed his or her address or moved from one precinct to another or from one county to another.
another, or to preregister to vote. The person taking the application shall ask if the applicant is a
citizen of the United States. If the applicant states that the applicant is not a citizen of the United
States, or declines to answer the question, the person taking the application shall inform the
applicant that it is a felony for a person who is not a citizen of the United States to apply to
register to vote. The application shall state in clear language the penalty for violation of this
Page 24 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
section. The necessary forms shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections. Board. The
form must ask for the previous voter registration address of the voter, if any. If a previous address
is listed, and it is not in the county of residence of the applicant, the appropriate county board of
elections shall treat the application as an authorization to cancel the previous registration and also
process it as such under the procedures of G.S. 163-82.9. If a previous address is listed and that
address is in the county where the voter applies to register, the application shall be processed as
if it had been submitted under G.S. 163-82.9.
Registration shall become effective as provided in G.S. 163-82.7. Applications to register to
vote accepted at a drivers license office under this section until the deadline established in
G.S. 163-82.6(d)(2) shall be treated as timely made for an election, and no person who completes
an application at that drivers license office shall be denied the vote in that election for failure to
apply earlier than that deadline.
All applications shall be forwarded by the Department of Transportation to the appropriate
board of elections not later than five business days after the date of acceptance, according to rules
which shall be promulgated by the State Board of Elections. Board. Those rules shall provide for
a paperless, instant, electronic transfer of applications to the appropriate board of elections.
Applications for preregistration shall be forwarded to the State Board."
SECTION 17.3.(e) G.S. 163-82.20 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-82.20. Voter registration at other public agencies.
(a) Voter Registration Agencies. – Every office in this State which accepts:
(1) Applications for a program of public assistance under Article 2 of Chapter
108A of the General Statutes or under Article 13 of Chapter 130A of the
General Statutes;
(2) Applications for State-funded State or local government programs primarily
engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities, with such office
designated by the State Board of Elections; Board; or
(3) Claims for benefits under Chapter 96 of the General Statutes, the Employment
Security Law, is designated as a voter registration agency for purposes of this
section.
(b) Duties of Voter Registration Agencies. – A voter registration agency described in
subsection (a) of this section shall, unless the applicant declines, in writing, to register to vote:or
preregister to vote, do each of the following:
(1) Distribute with each application for service or assistance, and with each
recertification, renewal, or change of address relating to such service or
assistance:
a. The voter registration application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a)
or (b); or
b. The voter registration agency's own form, if it is substantially
equivalent to the form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b) and has
been approved by the State Board of Elections, Board, provided that
the agency's own form may be a detachable part of the agency's paper
application or may be a paperless computer process, as long as the
applicant is required to sign an attestation as part of the application to
register.register or preregister.
(2) Provide a form that contains the elements required by section 7(a)(6)(B) of
the National Voter Registration Act; andAct.
(3) Provide to each applicant who does not decline to register or preregister to
vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the
registration application as is provided by the office with regard to the
completion of its own forms.
…
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 25

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Prohibitions. – Any person providing any service under subsection (b) of this section
shall not:
(1) Seek to influence an applicant's political preference or party registration,
except that this shall not be construed to prevent the notice provided by
G.S. 163-82.4(d) to be given if the applicant refuses to declare his party
affiliation;
(2) Display any such political preference or party allegiance;
(3) Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of
which is to discourage the applicant from registering or preregistering to vote;
or
(4) Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of
which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register or preregister
or not to register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.
(f) Confidentiality of Declination to Register. – No information relating to a declination
to register or preregister to vote in connection with an application made at a voter registration
agency may be used for any purpose other than voter registration.
(g) Transmittal From Agency to Board of Elections. State Board. – Any voter registration
or preregistration application completed at a voter registration agency shall be accepted by that
agency in lieu of the applicant's mailing the application. Any such application so received shall
be transmitted to the appropriate board of elections not later than five business days after
acceptance, according to rules which shall be promulgated by the State Board of Elections.Board.
…
(i) Ineligible Applications Prohibited. – No person shall make application to register or
preregister to vote under this section if that person is ineligible on account of age, citizenship,
lack of residence for the period of time provided by law, or because of conviction of a felony."
SECTION 17.3.(f) G.S. 163-82.23 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-82.23. Voter registration at public high schools.
Every public high school shall make available to its students and others who are eligible to
register or preregister to vote the application forms described in G.S. 163-82.3, and shall keep a
sufficient supply of the forms so that they are always available. A local board of education may,
but is not required to, designate high school employees to assist in completing the forms. Only
employees who volunteer for this duty may be designated by boards of education."

PART XVIII. ALLOW DEPLOYED FIRST RESPONDERS TO USE ABSENTEE
VOTING PROCEDURES FOR MILITARY OVERSEAS CITIZENS
SECTION 18.1. G.S. 163-258.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-258.2. Definitions.
As used in this Article:
(1) "Covered voter" means any of the following:
a. A uniformed-service voter or an overseas voter who is registered to
vote in this State.
b. A uniformed-service voter defined in subdivision (7) of this section
whose voting residence is in this State and who otherwise satisfies this
State's voter eligibility requirements.
c. An overseas voter who, before leaving the United States, was last
eligible to vote in this State and, except for a State residency
requirement, otherwise satisfies this State's voter eligibility
requirements.
d. An overseas voter who, before leaving the United States, would have
been last eligible to vote in this State had the voter then been of voting
Page 26 House Bill 580-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
age and, except for a State residency requirement, otherwise satisfies
this State's voter eligibility requirements.
e. An overseas voter who was born outside the United States, is not
described in sub-subdivision c. or d. of this subdivision, and, except
for a State residency requirement, otherwise satisfies this State's voter
eligibility requirements, if:
1. The last place where a parent or legal guardian of the voter
was, or under this Article would have been, eligible to vote
before leaving the United States is within this State; and
2. The voter has not previously registered to vote in any other
state.
f. A voter who is registered to vote in this State and who has been
deployed by the voter's employer away from the voter's county of
residence to respond to a disaster declared by the Governor or the
President of the United States within 60 days before an election.
…."

PART XIX. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 19.1. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections
held on or after that date.
House Bill 580-First Edition Page 27